Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 9 Law Enforcement Officer Training and Standards
12-9-116. Persons with disabilities training.

In accordance with the certification requirements of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training for law enforcement officers, all law enforcement officers in the state shall complete additional continuing education and training as needed relating to persons with disabilities in a law enforcement context.

Practicum training shall also be sufficient for the requirement under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

Training under subsection (a) of this section shall include without limitation:

The dynamics of relating to a person with a disability;

Interview techniques;

Available supportive services; and

Pro-arrest guidelines and drawbacks of dual arrest and practices to promote the safety of law enforcement officers.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 391, § 2, provided: “Applicability. This act applies to a certified law enforcement officer who retired or died on or after January 1, 2014.”

Pursuant to Acts 2017, No. 845, §6, this section is set out as amended by Acts 2017, No. 183, §1. Acts 2017, No. 845, §1, would have repealed subsection (b) of this section.

Acts 2017, No. 845, §6, provided: “CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that:

“(1)The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-First General Assembly;

“(2)To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the regular session of the Ninety-First General Assembly and this act:

“(A)The act of the regular session of the Ninety-First General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General Assembly for the purpose of:

“(i)Giving the act of the regular session of the Ninety-First General Assembly its full force and effect; and

“(ii)Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987; and

“(B)Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and

“(3)This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes to the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 183 inserted “or a state-funded law enforcement training academy” and similar language throughout the section.

The 2017 amendment by No. 845 deleted the (a) designation and deleted (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “division” for “commission” in the section heading and throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in the introductory language of (a).

Use of force;

Vehicle pursuit;

Professional conduct of law enforcement officers to be employed by the law enforcement agency; and

Biased-based policing;

The administrative structure and organizational chart of the law enforcement agency; and

Any other information or documentation required by the commission.

After the appearance and presentation under subsection (b) of this section, the commission shall approve or disapprove the request to create the new law enforcement agency or reactivate the inactive law enforcement agency.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “state law or” in (a); and, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “by law” for “by ordinance” and “the law and” for “the ordinance and”.

The dynamics of relating to an individual:

With a behavioral health impairment as defined in § 20-47-803;

Who has demonstrated a substantial likelihood of committing bodily harm against himself or herself;

Who has demonstrated a substantial likelihood of committing bodily harm against another person; or

Who is under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance to the extent that the individual's judgment and decision-making process is impaired;

Available mental health service providers and support services;

The voluntary and involuntary commitment process;

Law enforcement interaction with hospitals, mental health professionals, the judiciary, and the mental health services community; and

Practices to promote the safety of law enforcement officers and the public.

Crisis intervention team training under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall emphasize understanding of behavioral impairments and mental illnesses and shall incorporate the development of communication skills, practical experience, and role-playing.

Participants in the crisis intervention team training under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall be introduced to mental health professionals, consumers, and family members in both the classroom and through onsite visits.

A local law enforcement agency, including a county sheriff's office, but not a municipal law enforcement agency that employs less than ten (10) full-time law enforcement officers, shall employ at least one (1) law enforcement officer who has completed within eighteen (18) months of August 1, 2017, the crisis intervention team training as described under subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

A local law enforcement agency, including a county sheriff's office, is encouraged to:

Have at least twenty percent (20%) of the certified law enforcement officers that it employs complete the crisis intervention team training offered under subdivision (c)(2) of this section;

Develop and implement a model policy addressing law enforcement response to persons affected by a behavioral impairment; and

Establish a clearly defined and sustainable partnership with one (1) or more community mental health organizations.

All training required under this section and the curriculum for the training shall be developed by the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training, in collaboration with the Criminal Justice Institute.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “commission” in (e).

The seriousness of the violation;

The law enforcement agency's or governmental entity's history of violations;

The amount the commission believes is necessary to deter future similar violations;

Efforts made by the law enforcement agency or governmental entity to correct the violation, including the immediacy and degree of corrective action; and

Any other consideration that the commission believes important.

For appointing a person who does not meet minimum standards as a law enforcement officer, an administrative penalty of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and

For failing to timely submit any required appointment or separation documents, an administrative penalty of no more than three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

The administrative penalties authorized under this subsection may be assessed on a per-day basis, with each day considered a separate violation.

The presence of mitigating factors does not require the commission to dismiss a violation of commission rules.

(1)The Director of Law Enforcement Standards and Training may enter into an agreed-upon order concerning administrative penalties under this section with a law enforcement agency or governmental entity, subject to final approval of the commission.

(1)The commission shall provide written notice to a law enforcement agency or governmental entity of an alleged violation of a rule, and the law enforcement agency or governmental entity shall respond in writing within thirty (30) days of receipt of the written notice.

A law enforcement agency or governmental entity may request a hearing before the commission to contest the allegations set forth in the written notice under subsection (e) of this section within thirty (30) days of receipt of the written notice.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” near the beginning, substituted “employees of the division” for “employees of the commission”, and substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “commission” at the end; substituted “division” for “commission” in (a)(2)(A); rewrote (a)(2)(B); and substituted “division” for “commission” in the introductory language of (b)(1) and in (b)(2).

The signs and symptoms of an overdose associated with the use of a controlled substance, including opioids;

First-responder treatment and triage for a controlled substance overdose situation;

First-responder safety considerations in a potential or actual controlled substance overdose situation; and

An overview of the role of naloxone in certain opioid overdose situations.

Cross References. Police training school, §12-8-119.

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 608, § 10: Apr. 21, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that the Sixty-Seventh General Assembly has, by a vote of two-thirds of the members elected to both Houses, voted to extend the regular session of the Sixty-Seventh General Assembly, as authorized in the Constitution; that under the provisions of Const., Amend. 7, enactments of the General Assembly that do not have an emergency clause do not become effective until ninety (90) days after the date of final adjournment of the General Assembly; that the extended session of the General Assembly may not adjourn in time for this act to take effect prior to July 1, 1969, thereby depriving the agency for which funds are appropriated herein of necessary operating funds to commence the next fiscal biennium; and in order that the appropriation made herein may be available on July 1, 1969, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this act is necessary for the maintenance and operation of the essential governmental services. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval, provided that the appropriation authorized herein shall not be available until July 1, 1969.”

Acts 1979, No. 147, § 3: Feb. 19, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the extent of the law enforcement authority of teaching and instruction personnel at the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy is not clear under the present law; that it is essential that such personnel have broad law enforcement authority with respect to the control and protection of academy property and personnel both on and off the premises of the academy, and broad authority to cooperate with, assist and support local law enforcement officers in performing law enforcement functions; and that this act is designed to specifically give such personnel law enforcement authority and should be given effect at the earliest possible date to enable such personnel to more effectively and efficiently carry out their responsibilities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 1051, § 2: Apr. 3, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that full-time law enforcement instructors at Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy need access to restricted law enforcement training classes and material to ensure current skills are maintained while instructing law enforcement personnel in basic police training and other law enforcement training courses; that a delay in the implementation of this act will hamper the state's ability to provide training and certification of an adequate number of law enforcement officers; and that this act is immediately necessary because the state needs to ensure that law enforcement personnel are trained and certified in sufficient time to provide for the public safety of the citizens of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1330, § 2: Mar. 29, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that full-time law enforcement instructors at the Arkansas Police Corps Training Program at the University of Arkansas at Little Rock need access to restricted law enforcement training classes and material to ensure that current skills are maintained while instructing law enforcement personnel in basic police training and other law enforcement training courses; and that a delay in the implementation of this act will hamper the state's ability to provide training and certification of an adequate number of law enforcement officers. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1199, § 1.

12-9-117. Award of pistol upon retirement or death of a certified law enforcement officer employed by the division.

When a certified law enforcement officer employed by the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training or a state-funded law enforcement training academy retires from service or dies while still employed with the division or the state-funded law enforcement training academy, in recognition of and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased certified law enforcement officer, the division or the state-funded law enforcement training academy may award the pistol carried by the certified law enforcement officer at the time of his or her death or retirement from service to:

The certified law enforcement officer; or

The certified law enforcement officer's spouse if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

(1)A certified law enforcement officer employed by the division or a state-funded law enforcement training academy may retain his or her pistol he or she carried at the time of his or her retirement from service.

If the certified law enforcement officer dies while he or she is employed by the division or a state-funded law enforcement training academy, his or her spouse may receive or retain the pistol carried by the certified law enforcement officer at the time of his or her death, if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 391, § 1; 2017, No. 183, § 1; 2017, No. 845, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 5819.

12-9-118. New or inactive law enforcement agency — Approval by commission required — Definition.

As used in this section, “inactive law enforcement agency” means a law enforcement agency that existed and operated under a state law or local ordinance in the past but that currently does not exist or has not operated for at least one (1) year.

The chief executive officer of an entity authorized by law to create a new law enforcement agency or reactivate an inactive law enforcement agency shall appear before the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training to request the creation of the new law enforcement agency or reactivation of the inactive law enforcement agency and present the law and documentation regarding:

The funding mechanism, funding source or sources, and current budget proposal for the law enforcement agency;

The proposed or enacted law enforcement agency policies, including without limitation policies regarding:

History.

Acts 2017, No. 378, § 1; 2019, No. 151, § 1.

12-9-119. Behavioral health crisis intervention training.

(1)In accordance with the certification requirements of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training for law enforcement officers, a law enforcement officer enrolled in a commission-certified basic police training academy shall complete at least sixteen (16) hours of training relating to behavioral health crisis intervention in a law enforcement context.

Practicum training is sufficient for the requirement under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

Training under subsection (a) of this section shall include without limitation:

The commission shall certify:

Specialized training for qualified law enforcement officers of at least eight (8) hours; and

(A)Crisis intervention team training of at least forty (40) hours taught over five (5) consecutive days.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 423, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 5820.

12-9-120. Imposition of administrative penalties.

When determining the amount of an administrative penalty assessed against a law enforcement agency or governmental entity under subsection (b) of this section for violation of a rule of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, the commission shall consider:

(1)An administrative penalty may be assessed under this section in the following amounts:

The agreed-upon order under subdivision (d)(1) of this section may be in an amount that differs from the amounts in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

A law enforcement agency's or governmental entity's failure to respond within thirty (30) days of the written notice under subdivision (e)(1) of this section may result in the entry of a default order of assessment of an administrative penalty.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 497, § 10.

12-9-121. Additional salary payment.

(1)The Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training may make additional salary payments from available funds to employees of the division who have attained law enforcement certification above the basic certificate level, as defined by the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

The award of an additional salary payment under this section is contingent upon the:

Existence of sufficient funding independent of funding specifically set aside for other programs within the division; and

Discretion of the Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training in coordination with the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

(1)Eligible employees of the division may be paid up to the following annual amounts for the respective certifications:

General certificate — three hundred dollars ($300);

Intermediate certificate — six hundred dollars ($600);

Advanced certificate — nine hundred dollars ($900); and

Senior certificate — one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200).

Payment of the additional salary amounts may be made monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually depending upon the availability of funding and is restricted to full-time law enforcement officers employed by the division.

Additional salary payments made under this section are considered part of the employee's regular income and subject to all applicable withholding required by law.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 631, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5821.

12-9-122. Controlled substance overdose identification training — Definition.

As used in this section, “naloxone” means a drug that is an analgesic antagonist used in the reversal of acute respiratory depression caused by opioid use.

(1)The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training in conjunction with the Arkansas Drug Director and the Criminal Justice Institute shall develop a curriculum for law enforcement training relating to identifying the signs that a person is experiencing an overdose of a controlled substance and the ways in which a law enforcement officer can safely assist the person who has overdosed.

A curriculum that is developed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section and certified by the commission shall be delivered to a student attending a basic law enforcement training course certified by the commission.

Training under subsection (b) of this section shall include without limitation:

All law enforcement agencies are encouraged to develop a naloxone program by seeking assistance from the Arkansas Drug Director's office or the Criminal Justice Institute, or both.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 646, § 1.

12-9-123. Missing and unidentified persons training.

(1)In accordance with the certification requirements of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, all law enforcement officers in the state shall complete training related to the investigation of unidentified and missing persons.

Practicum training shall also be sufficient for the requirement under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

Training under subsection (a) of this section may include training conducted in conjunction with resources available through the National Missing and Unidentified Persons System.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 920, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Law Enforcement Training Academy

12-9-201. Establishment.

There is established the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy for the training and instruction of state, county, municipal, and other law enforcement officers.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 526, § 1; 1965, No. 172, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-701.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1981, No. 45, § 7, provided, in part, that the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy, which was transferred by a type 4 transfer to the Department of Public Safety pursuant to Acts 1971, No. 38, § 14 [repealed], would be detached from that department and transferred to the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training, which commission would succeed to all powers, functions, and duties of the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy and the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy Board. It further provided that all the property, equipment, personnel, and funds of the Law Enforcement Training Academy Division of the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1) would be transferred to, and thereafter administered by, the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training and that the act should not be construed so as to reduce any right which an employee of the Law Enforcement Training Academy would have under any civil service or merit system.

12-9-202. Location of academy.

The Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy shall be located at a place which, in the opinion of the Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training, will serve the best interests of the state in the carrying out of the intent and purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 526, § 3; 1965, No. 172, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-703; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5822.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training”.

12-9-203. Acceptance of gifts, grants, etc. — Disposition.

The Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training may accept gifts, grants, donations, equipment and materials, and bequests of money or gratuities donated by private persons or corporations.

All moneys received under subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited into the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy Cash Fund.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training may” for “The Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy is granted authority to” in (a); and, in (b), substituted “All moneys received under subsection (a) of this section” for “All such money so received” and “Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy Cash Fund” for “State Treasury to the credit of the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account of the State General Government Fund”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (a).

The Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training;

Employees of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training appointed by the Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training as law enforcement officers;

The Director of the Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy; and

Instructors of the Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy.

The personnel described in subsection (a) of this section shall:

Be credited with service toward maintaining and increasing certification levels for time employed at the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training or the division and the Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy; and

Receive credit for years of law enforcement service for time employed at the commission or the division, the Arkansas Police Corps Program at the University of Arkansas at Little Rock, or the Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy upon employment as law enforcement officers elsewhere in the State of Arkansas.

The personnel described in subsection (a) of this section:

Are not qualified to enroll in a different retirement system because of their classification and designation as law enforcement officers; and

Shall not qualify for any benefit enhancement other than that available under their current retirement system.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “the Arkansas Police Corps Training Program at the University of Arkansas at Little Rock” in (a), (c)(2) and (d).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Academy instructors” in the section heading; rewrote (a); substituted “described in subsection (a) of this section have” for “shall have and exercise” in (b)(1); substituted “described in subsection (a) of this section” for “shall” in (b)(2); inserted “described in subsection (a) of this section” in the introductory language of (c); substituted “commission” for “Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy” in (c)(1) and (c)(2); and rewrote (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Director of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (a)(1);rewrote (a)(2); and substituted “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training or the division” for “commission” in (c)(1); and inserted “or the division” in (c)(2).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning approval of applications, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 497, §13. The section was derived from Acts 1963, No. 526, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-702.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “may” for “shall” in (b)(2).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 608, § 7; 2017, No. 497, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 5823.

12-9-204. Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training — Law enforcement powers.

The following persons are classified and designated as law enforcement officers after meeting minimum qualifications for law enforcement officers' certification as established by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training:

(1)The personnel described in subsection (a) of this section have all authority and functions of other law enforcement officers in the State of Arkansas.

The personnel described in subsection (a) of this section have general law enforcement authority to cooperate with, assist, and support local law enforcement officers in all law enforcement activities and functions.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 147, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-708; Acts 1995, No. 365, § 1; 2003, No. 1051, § 1; 2005, No. 1330, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 12; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5824, 5825.

12-9-205. [Repealed.]

The Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy shall furnish, without cost to applicants, the necessary food, lodging, laundry, and other necessary expenses while attending the academy.

(1)However, the salary of applicants and the necessary transportation cost in traveling to and from the academy shall be paid by the municipality or county in which employed.

The travel expenses of a constable in attending the academy may be paid by the county.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 526, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-705; Acts 2011, No. 561, § 1.

12-9-207. Newly elected or unopposed candidates for county sheriff.

A newly elected county sheriff or unopposed candidate for the position of county sheriff may attend a state-funded law enforcement training academy for purposes of training and instruction.

The county in which the newly elected county sheriff or unopposed candidate for the position of county sheriff is to be employed shall pay any necessary transportation costs in traveling to and from the state-funded law enforcement training academy.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 183, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-706, 42-707; Acts 2017, No. 183, § 2.

12-9-208. State Capitol Police — Training course.

All members of the State Capitol Police shall satisfactorily complete the training course for law enforcement officers at the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy within nine (9) months of their hire date or any extension granted by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 468, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 14.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “nine (9)” for “twelve (12)” preceding “months” and added “or any extension granted by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training”.

Cross References. Secretary of State, powers and duties generally, §25-16-403.

12-9-209. Reimbursement for training costs.

If a county, city, town, or state agency pays the cost or expenses for training a law enforcement officer at a state-funded law enforcement training academy and another county, city, town, or state agency employs that law enforcement officer within eighteen (18) months after completion of the training in a position requiring a certificate of training from the state-funded law enforcement training academy, the county, city, town, or state agency so employing the law enforcement officer, at the time of employing the law enforcement officer, shall reimburse the county, city, town, or state agency for all or a portion of the expenses incurred by the county, city, town, or state agency for the training of the law enforcement officer at the state-funded law enforcement training academy, unless the law enforcement officer has been terminated by the county, city, town, or state agency that paid the costs or expenses of training, in which case no reimbursement is required from the county, city, town, or state agency hiring the law enforcement officer.

Reimbursement may be sought only from the first county, city, town, or state agency that employed the law enforcement officer after the county, city, town, or state agency paid the costs or expenses of training.

Reimbursement shall include any salary, travel expenses, food, lodging, or other costs required to be paid by the county, city, town, or state agency, as follows:

If the person is employed within two (2) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse the total cost of the training;

If the person is employed more than two (2) months but not more than six (6) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse eighty percent (80%) of the cost of the training;

If the person is employed more than six (6) months but not more than ten (10) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse sixty percent (60%) of the cost of the training;

If the person is employed more than ten (10) months but not more than fourteen (14) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse forty percent (40%) of the cost of the training; or

If the person is employed more than fourteen (14) months but not more than eighteen (18) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse twenty percent (20%) of the cost of the training.

If any county, city, town, or state agency which employs an officer whose training expense was paid by another county, city, town, or state agency fails to make reimbursement for the expenses as required in subsection (a) of this section, the county, city, town, or state agency entitled to reimbursement shall notify the Treasurer of State.

The Treasurer of State shall then withhold the amount of the reimbursement due for training the officer from the county or municipal aid of the employing county, city, town, or state agency or from funds appropriated to the employing state agency and shall remit the amount to the county, city, town, or state agency which is entitled to the reimbursement under the provisions of this section.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (a)(1) and (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “Counties, cities, etc.” from the beginning of the section heading; inserted “or state agency” throughout the section; and made stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 880, §§ 1, 2; 1993, No. 191, § 1; 2017, No. 183, § 3; 2019, No. 151, § 2.

12-9-210. Designated law enforcement agencies.

The Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training and the Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy are designated as law enforcement agencies.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 272, § 1; 2017, No. 497, § 15; 2019, No. 910, § 5826.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted the (a) designation; substituted “The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “The Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy”; and deleted former (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training”.

12-9-211. Private college or university law enforcement officers.

A law enforcement officer for a private college or university is permitted to attend the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy for training and instruction.

The private college or university for which the law enforcement officer is employed shall:

Pay any necessary transportation cost in traveling to and from the academy; and

Reimburse the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training for any cost associated with the private college or university law enforcement officer's training or instruction at the academy.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (b)(2).

Cross References. Law enforcement agencies for private colleges and universities, §12-20-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 757, § 11: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the use and authority of persons appointed by the law enforcement agency director, chief, or sheriff and who are known by such terms as voluntary, auxiliary, reserves, voluntary officers, mounted patrol, etc., are important to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state. There is no statutory authority to regulate the appointment and training, the supervision or the authority of the auxiliary law enforcement officer. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the protection of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 275, § 3: Mar. 17, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, Section 8 of Act 757 of 1983 as presently written is in conflict with other state laws which provide tort immunity for Arkansas local governments and their employees, volunteer firemen and auxiliary police and this act will conform to other existing laws and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 6: Aug. 22, 1994. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under present law auxiliary law enforcement officers may not receive compensation for their services; that this restriction is unreasonable and makes it impossible for political subdivisions to engage the services of such officers; that in some rural areas, there is a severe shortage of law enforcement officers and some political subdivisions in such areas are desirous of engaging the services of auxiliary law enforcement officers to perform certain specific functions; that this act is designed to remove the restriction on compensation of auxiliary law enforcement officers to enable local political subdivisions to engage the services of such officers and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 2013, No. 227, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5827.

Subchapter 3

— Auxiliary Law Enforcement Officers